Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
CHAPTER 3 Municipal Elections and Primaries

21-3-1 through 21-3-480.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 2, effective January 1, 1999.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 21-3-16 (Ga. L. 1974, p. 522, § 2 and Ga. L. 1976, p. 205, § 4), relating to false statements in connection with filing notice of candidacy, was repealed by Ga. L. 1984, p. 661, § 1.

Former Code Section 21-3-17 (Ga. L. 1968, p. 885, § 1), relating to penalty for violation of chapter, was repealed by Ga. L. 1984, p. 661, § 2.

Former Code Section 21-3-133.1 (Ga. L. 1984, p. 1490, § 6), relating to exchange of municipality and county elector lists, was repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, § 17.

Former Code Section 21-3-264 (Code 1981, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 964, § 5), relating to use of optical scan voting systems, was repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 21.

Former Code Section 21-3-325 (Code 1933 § 34A-1213.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 355, § 21, Ga. L. 1974, p. 82, § 21), relating to methods of casting ballots in elections utilizing paper ballots or vote recorders, was repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 15.

Former Code Section 21-3-476 (Ga. L. 1984, p. 661, § 3), relating to selling or buying alcoholic beverages on primary or election days, was repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1508, § 2.

Former Code Section 21-3-480 (Code 1981, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 143, § 14), relating to use of list of electors for commercial purposes prohibited, was repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 14.

This chapter consisted of Code Sections 21-3-1 through 21-3-7, 21-3-7.1, 21-3-8 through 21-3-17 (Article 1), 21-3-30 through 21-3-39 (Article 2), 21-3-50 through 21-3-53 (Article 3, Part 1), 21-3-60 through 21-3-64 (Article 3, Part 2), 21-3-70 through 21-3-72 (Article 4), 21-3-90 through 21-3-105 (Article 5), 21-3-120 through 21-3-130, 21-3-130.1, 21-3-131 through 21-3-133, 21-3-133.1, 21-3-134 through 21-3-143 (Article 6), 21-3-160, 21-3-161, 21-3-161.1, 21-3-162 through 21-3-166 (Article 7), 21-3-180 through 21-3-194 (Article 8), 21-3-210 (Article 9, Part 1), 21-3-220 through 21-3-234 (Article 9, Part 2), 21-3-250 through 21-3-264 (Article 9, Part 3), 21-3-265 through 21-3-279 (Article 9, Part 4), 21-3-279.1 through 21-3-279.4 (Article 9, Part 5), 21-3-280 through 21-3-291 (Article 10), 21-3-310 through 21-3-318, 21-3-318.1, 21-3-319 through 21-3-328 (Article 11, Part 1), 21-3-340 through 21-3-348 (Article 11, Part 2), 21-3-360 through 21-3-367 (Article 11, Part 3), 21-3-380 through 21-3-383 (Article 11, Part 4), 21-3-385, 21-3-385.1 through 21-3-385.6 (Article 11, Part 5), 21-3-400 through 21-3-408, 21-3-408.1, 21-3-409, 21-3-410 (Article 12), 21-3-420 through 21-3-422, 21-3-422.1, 21-3-423 through 21-3-430 (Article 13), 21-3-440 through 21-3-480 (Article 14), relating to municipal elections and primaries, and was based on

Orig. Code 1863, § 1232; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 24, § 1; Code 1868, § 1313; Code 1873, § 1286; Code 1882, § 1286; Ga. L. 1894, p. 115, §§ 7—10, 12, 16; Civil Code 1895, §§ 50, 52, 56, 58—60, 64, 65, 70; Ga. L. 1898, p. 93, § 1; Ga. L. 1908, p. 58, §§ 6, 8, 10; Civil Code 1910, §§ 52, 54, 59, 63, 65—68, 71, 74, 75, 80; Ga. L. 1913, p. 115, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1924, p. 186, §§ 3, 4, 6, 11, 12, 14; Code 1933, §§ 34-115, 34-301, 34-303, 34-405, 34-408, 34-602, 34-604, 34-605, 34-701, 34-801, 34-804, 34-1101, 34-1102, 34-1302, 34-1904—34-1906, 34-1914, 34-3302, 34-3303, 34-3305, 34-3311, 34-3312, 34-3314; Ga. L. 1941, p. 321, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 324, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1941, p. 429, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 228, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 290, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 347, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 353, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1946, p. 75, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1948 Ex. Sess., p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1204, §§ 6, 8, 10, 11, 13—15, 18, 19, 23, 24, 26, 28, 29, 32—36, 38, 39, 42, 45, 47, 52; Ga. L. 1952, p. 304, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 579, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 204, §§ 1—3, 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 344, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 732, §§ 1—3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 333, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 682, §§ 1—4; Ga. L. 1957, p. 39, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 71, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 385, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 269, §§ 1, 2, 3, 5, 8, 10—12, 15, 16, 20—24, 27, 28, 30—33, 36, 39, 42; Ga. L. 1959, p. 182, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 257, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 955, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 162, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 164, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 557, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 98, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 504, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 618, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 678, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 73, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 172, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 506, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 34A-101—34A-111, 34A-201, 34A-301—34A-303, 34A-401—34A-408, 34A-501—34A-511, 34A-513—34A-524, 34A-601—34A-607, 34A-701—34A-706, 34A-801—34A-803, 34A-901—34A-915, 34A-1001—34A-1012, 34A-1101—34A-1131, 34A-1201—34A-1206, 34A-1206.1, 34A-1207—34A-1213, 34A-1213.1, 34A-1214—34A-1217, 34A-1217.1, 34A-1218—34A-1223, 34A-1223.1, 34A-1224—34A-1226, 34A-1226.1, 34A-1227—34A-1235, 34A-1301—34A-1313, 34A-1401— 34A-1410, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 885, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 282, §§ 1—3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 285, §§ 5, 6, 8, 9; Ga. L. 1969, p. 355, §§ 1—11, 13—30, 32, 33, 35—38; Ga. L. 1970, p. 341, §§ 1—11; Ga. L. 1971, p. 634, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 482, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 836, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 277, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 82, §§ 1—27; Ga. L. 1974, p. 99, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 522, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 686, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 769, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 872, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 888, §§ 1—10; Ga. L. 1976, p. 205, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1977, p. 173, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 303, §§ 1—5; Ga. L. 1977, p. 550, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1197, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1024, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1025, §§ 1—9, 11—14; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1035, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1039, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1042, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1045, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 631, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 960, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 964, §§ 1—4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 967, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 968, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 970, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1010, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 314, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 684, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1005, §§ 1, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1981, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 536, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 545, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 551, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1238, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1430, §§ 1—3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1716, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1728, §§ 1—11; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1801, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, §§ 1, 4, 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1670, §§ 1—6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, §§ 25-27; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 402, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 535, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 686, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 786, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, §§ 7—9; Ga. L. 1983, p. 964, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, §§ 16—22; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 634, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 661, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 674, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 675, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 677, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 826, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 860, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 922, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1038, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1087, §§ 8—13; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1372, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1490, §§ 4—6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, §§ 16—22; Ga. L. 1985, p. 632, § 6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1236, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1318, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1328, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 348, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 382, §§ 7—9; Ga. L. 1986, p. 772, §§ 7—10; Ga. L. 1986, p. 932, §§ 7—10; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1538, §§ 4—7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, §§ 10—16; Ga. L. 1987, p. 465, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 787, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, §§ 20—26; Ga. L. 1988, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 465, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 639, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 641, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 647, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 752, §§ 6—10; Ga. L. 1988, p. 765, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 926, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 928, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 964, §§ 3—5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 44, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 659, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 682, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 787, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 842, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 900, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 911, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1082, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1084, §§ 4—6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1742, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 53, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 143, §§ 7A, 8—14; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, §§ 9—14; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1238, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1399, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 316, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 599, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 632, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1163, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1693, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1697, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1815, §§ 6—10; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2510, §§ 4—6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, §§ 2, 11—16; Ga. L. 1993, p. 712, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, §§ 13, 14, 16, 17; Ga. L. 1994, p. 349, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, §§ 29—50; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, §§ 15—25; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 417, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 786, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, §§ 18—20, 20A, 21; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1044, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, §§ 13—15; Ga. L. 1996, p. 143, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, §§ 22—26; Ga. L. 1997, p. 8, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 548, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 649, §§ 7—9; Ga. L. 1997, p. 662, §§ 4—6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1048, §§ 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 20—24.